Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.22.041

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this section and RCW 30A.22.240 and 30A.22.245.

(1) "Customer" means any person, partnership, limited partnership, corporation, trust, or other legal entity that is transacting or has transacted business with a financial institution, that is using or has used the services of an institution, or for which a financial institution has acted or is acting as a fiduciary.

(2) "Financial institution" means state and national banks and trust companies, state and federal savings banks, state and federal savings and loan associations, and state and federal credit unions.

(3) "Law enforcement officer" means an employee of a public law enforcement agency organized under the authority of a county, city, or town and designated to obtain deposit account information by the chief law enforcement officer of that agency.

[ 2014 c 37 s 195; 1995 c 186 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.22.041.]